Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2098.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-311.4 of Title 63, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. For each live birth in this state for which a birth


certificate is issued, the birth certificate shall include


provisions to designate the citizenship of the biological parent or


parents of the child and provisions to designate the citizenship of


the child.


B. Provisions to designate the citizenship of the child shall


be limited to one or more of the following:


1. United States citizenship;


2. Oklahoma citizenship;

Req. No. 3441 Page 1


3. Tribal citizenship or membership; or


4. Foreign national/non-United States citizenship.


C. For any child born to parents neither of which are citizens


or legal residents of the United States, no United States or


Oklahoma citizenship shall be granted to the child and the only


designation permitted on the birth certificate shall be the


designation provided in paragraph 4 of subsection B of this section.


SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-3441 BRC 1/15/2026 12:31:33 PM























Req. No. 3441 Page 2